Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-1824
Competency restoration treatment; network of contract facilities and providers; department; powers.

The Department of Health and Human Services may establish a network of contract facilities and providers to provide competency restoration treatment pursuant to alternative treatment plans under section 29-1823. The department may create criteria for participation in such network and establish training in competency restoration treatment for participating contract facilities and providers.

Laws 2020, LB881, § 19.